Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.300

Effective reading programs—Information—Development and implementation of strategies.

(1) After effective programs have been identified in accordance with RCW 28A.300.290, the center for the improvement of student learning, or its designee, shall provide information and take other appropriate steps to inform elementary school teachers, principals, curriculum directors, superintendents, school board members, college and university reading instruction faculty, and others of its findings.

(2) The center, in cooperation with statewide organizations interested in improving literacy, also shall develop and implement strategies to improve reading instruction in the state, with a special emphasis on the instruction of reading in the primary grades using the effective reading programs that have been identified in accordance with RCW 28A.300.290. The strategies may include, but should not be limited to, expanding and improving reading instruction of elementary school teachers in teacher preparation programs, expanded in-service training in reading instruction, the training of paraprofessionals and volunteers in reading instruction, improving classroom-based assessment of reading, and increasing statewide and regional technical assistance in reading instruction.

[ 1998 c 245 s 11; 1996 c 273 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 273: See note following RCW 28A.300.290.